Louisiana, session 2026, HB1073.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 15:828.5 and 828.6 are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§828.5. Post-release employment; relevant documentation
A. The Department of Public Safety and Corrections, referred to in this
Section as the "department", shall provide an inmate who has been released from a
term of imprisonment that resulted from the commission of a felony offense and who
has designated his intended residence within this state, with the relevant
documentation to assist with obtaining post-release employment.
B.(1) The department shall coordinate with the office of motor vehicles to
do both of the following:
Page 1 of 8
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2612 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1073
(a) Identify whether an inmate has a state identification card or driver's
license and begin the process of gathering the documentation required for the
issuance of a special identification card pursuant to R.S. 40:1321 within nine months
prior to the release of the inmate.
(b) Provide a special identification card to any eligible inmate who does not
have a current state identification card or driver's license upon his release from
custody. The special identification card shall be issued, replaced, canceled, and
denied in the same manner as a driver's license pursuant to Chapter 2 of Title 32 of
the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950.
(2) The office of motor vehicles shall do both of the following:
(a)(i) Authorize an inmate to use a certified copy of his birth certificate along
with his time computation record issued by the department as a valid form of photo
identification to obtain a special identification card.
(ii) For the purposes of this Subsection, "time computation record" means
a detailed calculation, maintained by the department, of the prison sentence of an
inmate that determines his release date and includes credit for time served, good
behavior, and program participation.
(b) Determine and assess a reasonable fee for the issuance of a special
identification card.
(3) A special identification card issued with a time computation record to an
inmate is nonrenewable, nontransferable, and is valid for a period of four years from
the month of issuance.
(4) The department may utilize any available funds, including but not limited
to inmate trust funds, existing department funds, and donations to cover the costs
associated with the implementation and administration of this Section and the
purchase of special identification cards.
C. The provisions of this Section apply only to inmates who receive a special
identification card pursuant to R.S. 40:1321.
Page 2 of 8
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2612 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1073
D. For the purposes of assisting an inmate with obtaining post-release
employment, the department shall provide an inmate with all of the following:
(1) A copy of the vocational training record of the inmate, if applicable.
(2) A copy of the work record of the inmate, if applicable.
(3) A certified copy of the birth certificate of the inmate, if obtainable.
(4) A social security card or a replacement social security card of the inmate,
if obtainable.
(5) A resume that includes any trade or vocational skill learned by the inmate
and the proficiency of the inmate at that trade or vocation.
(6) Documentation that the inmate has completed a simulated job interview.
(7) Notification that the inmate is eligible to apply for a license through a
state entity that is responsible for an occupational license or certification.
E. An inmate shall not be subject to the provisions of Paragraphs (D)(5) and
(6) of this Section prior to his release from imprisonment if he meets any of the
following criteria:
(1) He is sixty-five years of age or older.
(2) He is released on medical parole pursuant to R.S. 15:574.20 or is
discharged from a prison infirmary.
(3) He is released to the custody of another jurisdiction on a warrant or
detainer.
(4) He is determined by the department to be physically or mentally unable
to return to the workforce upon his release from incarceration.
F. The Department of Public Safety and Corrections, office of adult services,
and office of motor vehicles may promulgate rules and procedures in accordance
with the Administrative Procedure Act to implement the provisions of this Section.
§828.6. Certificates of employability
A. The legislature hereby finds that many individuals leave custody without
standardized documentation of education, training, work history, or readiness for
employment. It is the intent of the legislature to ensure successful reentry as a means
Page 3 of 8
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2612 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1073
to reduce recidivism, strengthen public safety, expand this state's available
workforce, and improve reentry outcomes through verification, documentation, and
practical job-readiness support.
B.(1) The Department of Public Safety and Corrections, referred to in this
Section as the "department", in addition to issuing the documentation provided in
R.S. 15:828.5, shall issue a certificate of employability to an inmate upon release if
all of the following conditions are met:
(a) The inmate earned any of the following while imprisoned:
(i) Credit for participation in any certified treatment and rehabilitation
program pursuant to R.S. 15:828.
(ii) Credit for participation in a workforce development work release
program pursuant to R.S. 15:828.
(iii) A bachelor's degree or master's degree from a regionally accredited and
department-approved educational institution pursuant to R.S. 15:828.
(iv) Credit for participation in a community resource center pursuant to R.S.
15:833.1.
(b) The inmate earned a high school equivalency certificate or a high school
diploma, a college degree, certification from a vocational or technical education
program, or a diploma or degree from a corresponding post-secondary education
program prior to imprisonment.
(c) The inmate received a score or level of competence as determined by the
department on a job skills assessment test administered by the department.
(2) The certificate shall be provided to the inmate at no cost, with his written
consent, on a form approved by the department. The certificate is valid unless
revoked and shall include available criminal history information, institutional
conduct records, educational and vocational program completion records, and
institutional work history. Each certificate shall be uniform, verifiable, and
recognizable by employers throughout the state.
Page 4 of 8
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2612 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1073
(3) The certificate does not entitle an inmate to relief from any of the
following:
(a) A requirement to register as a sex offender pursuant to Chapter 3-B of
Title 15 of the Louisiana Revised Statues of 1950.
(b) The suspension, cancellation, or revocation of a driver's license,
commercial driver's license, or restricted or hardship driver's license.
(c) A restriction on employment as a prosecutor or law enforcement officer.
(d) The denial, ineligibility, or automatic suspension of a license or
certification to provide healthcare services due to a substance use disorder.
C.(1) The department shall revoke the certificate of any individual who is
convicted of a felony after receipt of a certificate. The revocation of a certificate is
effective when the individual is notified of the revocation.
(2) The department shall provide an individual an opportunity to initiate a
cause of action pursuant to R.S. 15:1172 upon revocation of his certificate pursuant
to this Subsection.
(3) The revocation of a certificate shall not affect the right of an employer
who relied on the validity of the certificate unless the employer knew that the
certificate was fraudulent prior to employment of the individual.
D. The department shall, upon request and with the individual's consent,
confirm whether a certificate has been issued to a named individual and whether the
certificate is valid at both the time of the inquiry and at the time of response to that
inquiry.
E. The department shall not be civilly liable for any damages based upon its
decision to issue, deny, revoke, or decline to revoke a certificate issued to any
inmate.
F. It shall be a defense in any proceeding that alleges negligent hiring against
an employer, general contractor, premises owner, or other third party that the
employer, general contractor, premises owner, or other third party knew of the
certificate at the time of the alleged negligence. This Subsection does not apply in
Page 5 of 8
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2612 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1073
cases when the employer, general contractor, premises owner, or other third party
knew or should have known that the employee should not have been hired for the
position due to information obtained from a background check, including criminal
history.
G. The department shall do all of the following:
(1) Notify incoming inmates of the eligibility requirements associated with
a certificate of employability.
(2) Provide or coordinate resume development, interview preparation, and
job search assistance as part of reentry programming.
(3) Submit an annual report no later than February first of each year to the
House Committee on Administration of Criminal Justice and the Senate Committee
on Judiciary C. The report shall include all of the following:
(a) The number of certificates issued in the preceding twelve months.
(b) Participation in job-readiness services.
(c) Employment outcomes, where trackable.
(d) The rate of recidivism among released inmates who were previously
issued certificates.
(e) Any other relevant information.
H. The Department of Public Safety and Corrections, office of adult services,
may promulgate rules and procedures in accordance with the Administrative
Procedure Act to implement the provisions of this Section.
Section 2. Code of Evidence Article 416 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
Art. 416. Certificate of employability
A certificate of employability issued from the Department of Public Safety
and Corrections pursuant to R.S. 15:828.6 may be introduced in evidence at a
judicial or administrative proceeding that alleges the negligence or other fault of an
employer, general contractor, premises owner, or other third party for the negligent
hiring of or failure to adequately supervise an individual who has been issued a
certificate of employability if the employer, general contractor, premises owner, or
Page 6 of 8
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2612 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1073
other third party knew of the certificate at the time of the alleged negligence or other
fault.
Section 3. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.